pl: Elementy do pielęgnacji zwierząt w zestawie: Narzędzie do czyszczenia; Nakładka grzebieniowa; Szczotka do usuwania podszerstka; Pojemnik na pył; Wąż przedłużający; Rura przedłużająca; Szczotka do pielęgnacji; Dysza; Filtr wymienny; Torba / etui do przechowywania; Głowica tnąca; Pozostałe
hu: Az állatgondozási készlet tartozék komponensei: Tisztítóeszköz; Kefetartozék; Szőrtelenítő kefe; Porgyűjtő tartály; Hosszabbító tömlő; Hosszabbító cső; Ápolókefe; Fúvóka; Csere szűrő; Tárolótáska/-tok; Vágófej; Egyéb
sk-SK: Komponenty sú súčasťou sady na starostlivosť o zvieratá: Pomôcka na čistenie; Hrebeňový nadstavec; Kefa na odstraňovanie podsady; Nádoba na prach; Predlžovacia hadica; Predlžovacia trubica; Kefa na úpravu srsti; Tryska; Náhradný filter; Úložné vrece/puzdro; Zastrihávacia hlava strojčeka; Iné
de: Inbegriffene Bestandteile des Tierpflegesets: Reinigungswerkzeug; Kammaufsatz; Entfilzungsbürste; Staubbehälter; Verlängerungsschlauch; Verlängerungsrohr; Pflegebürste; Düse; Ersatzfilter; Aufbewahrungstasche/-koffer; Trimmerkopf; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Componentele incluse în setul de îngrijire a animalelor: Instrument de curățare; Accesoriu pieptene; Perie pentru îndepărtarea părului; Casetă de praf; Furtun prelungitor; Tub prelungitor; Perie de toaletare; Duză; Filtru de schimb; Geantă/suport de depozitare; Cap mașină de tuns; Altele
ru: Компоненты комплекта для ухода за животными: Инструмент для чистки; Насадка-гребень; Щетка для вычесывания шерсти; Контейнер-пылесборник; Удлинительный шланг; Удлинительная трубка; Щетка для ухода за шерстью; Насадка; Сменный фильтр; Чехлы и сумки для хранения; Насадка для стрижки волос; Другое
cs: Součásti sady pro péči o zvířata: Čisticí nástroj; Hřebenový nástavec; Vyčesávací kartáč; Nádoba na prach; Prodlužovací hadice; Prodlužovací trubice; Kartáč pro péči o srst; Tryska; Náhradní filtr; Skladovací taška/pouzdro; Zastřihovací hlavice; Jiné
vi: Thành phần của bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc thú cưng: Dụng cụ vệ sinh; Cữ lược tỉa lông; Lược lấy lông rụng; Thùng chứa bụi; Ống nối dài; Ống nối dài; Bàn chải chải lông; Vòi phun; Bộ lọc thay thế; Túi/hộp bảo quản; Đầu máy tông đơ tỉa lông; Khác
en: Animal care set components included: Cleaning tool; Comb attachment; De-shedding brush; Dust container; Extension hose; Extension tube; Grooming brush; Nozzle; Replacement filter; Storage bag/case; Trimming clipper head; Other
da: Komponenter i dyreplejesæt medfølger: Rengøringsværktøj; Kamtilbehør; Børste mod fældning; Støvbeholder; Forlængerslange; Forlængerrør; Plejebørste; Dyse; Erstatningsfilter; Opbevaringstaske/-etui; Klippehoved til trimning; Andet
fi: Eläintenhoitosetti sisältää osat: Puhdistustyökalu; Kampaosa; Karvanpoistoharja; Pölysäiliö; Jatkoletku; Jatkoputki; Turkinhoitoharja; Suutin; Vaihtosuodatin; Säilytyspussi/-kotelo; Leikkurin trimmauspää; Muu
fr: Éléments inclus dans le kit de soins pour animaux: Outil de nettoyage; Accessoire peigne; Brosse de démêlage; Conteneur à poussière; Tuyau de rallonge; Tube de rallonge; Brosse de toilettage; Buse; Filtre de remplacement; Sac/caisse de rangement; Tête de tondeuse; Autre
hr-HR: Uključene komponente seta za njegu životinja: Alat za čišćenje; Nastavak s češljem; Četka za uklanjanje dlake; Spremnik za prašinu; Produžno crijevo; Produžna cijev; Četka za njegu; Mlaznica; Zamjenski filtar; Vrećica/kutija za pohranu; Nastavak aparata za šišanje; Ostalo
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα σετ φροντίδας ζώων: Εργαλείο καθαρισμού; Χτενάκι προσαρμογής; Βούρτσα αφαίρεσης τριχόπτωσης; Δοχείο σκόνης; Εύκαμπτος σωλήνας/προέκταση; Άκαμπτος σωλήνας/προέκταση; Βούρτσα περιποίησης; Ακροφύσιο; Ανταλλακτικό φίλτρο; Θήκη αποθήκευσης; Κεφαλή κουρευτικής μηχανής; Άλλο
zh-TW: 動物照護套裝包含組件: 清潔工具; 梳子配件; 除毛刷; 集塵容器; 延長軟管; 延長管; 梳毛刷; 噴嘴; 替換濾芯; 收納袋/箱; 修毛剪頭; 其他
bg-BG: Включени компоненти от комплекта за грижа за животни: Инструмент за почистване; Приставка гребен; Фурминатор; Контейнер за прах; Удължителен маркуч; Удължителна тръба; Четка за груминг; Накрайник; Резервен филтър; Чанта/калъф за съхранение; Глава за машинка за подстригване; Друго
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen van de dierenverzorgingsset: Reinigingsgereedschap; Kamopzetstuk; Ontharingsborstel; Stofcontainer; Verlengslang; Verlengbuis; Verzorgingsborstel; Mondstuk; Vervangend filter; Opbergtas/-koffer; Trimkop; Overig
ko: 동물 관리 세트 포함 구성품: 청소 도구; 빗살캡; 털갈이용 브러시; 먼지통; 연장 호스; 연장 튜브; 그루밍용 브러시; 노즐; 교체 필터; 수납 가방/케이스; 트리밍 클리퍼 헤드; 기타
ja: 動物ケアセットの同梱コンポーネント: クリーニングツール; コームアタッチメント; デシェディングブラシ; ダストコンテナー; 延長ホース; 延長チューブ; グルーミングブラシ; ノズル; 交換用フィルター; 収納袋/ケース; トリミングクリッパーヘッド; その他
lt-LT: Gyvūnų priežiūros rinkinio sudedamosios dalys: Valymo įrankis; Šukų antgalis; Šėrimosi šepetys; Dulkių konteineris; Ilginimo žarna; Prailginimo žarnelė; Kailio priežiūros šepetys; Antgalis; Keičiamas filtras; Laikymo maišelis; Kirpimo mašinėlės galvutė; Kita
zh-CN: 包含的动物护理套装配件: 清洁工具; 梳子附件; 去毛刷; 集尘容器; 延长软管; 延长管; 梳毛刷; 喷嘴; 更换滤芯; 收纳袋/盒; 修剪刀头; 其他
sv: Komponenter för djurskötsel som ingår: Rengöringsverktyg; Kamtillbehör; Avpälsningsborste; Dammbehållare; Förlängningsslang; Förlängningstub; Pälsborste; Munstycke; Utbytesfilter; Förvaringsväska; Trimmerhuvud; Övrigt
es: Componentes del set de cuidado de animales incluidos: Herramienta de limpieza; Accesorio del cepillo; Cepillo para quitar pelo; Contenedor de polvo; Manguera de extensión; Tubo de extensión; Cepillo para acicalar; Boquilla; Filtro de repuesto; Bolsa/caja de almacenamiento; Cabezal de corte de la cortadora; Otros
nb: Iknluderte komponenter for dyrepleiesett: Rengjøringsverktøy; Kamtilbehør; Børste mot hårrester; Støvbeholder; Forlengelsesslange; Forlengelsesrør; Stellebørste; Munnstykke; Erstatningsfiltre; Oppevaringspose/kasse; Trimming av klipperhode; Annet
sl-SI: Priložene komponente kompleta za nego živali: Čistilno orodje; Nastavek za glavnik; Krtača za odstranjevanje izpadajoče dlake; Posoda za prah; Podaljševalna cev; Podaljševalna cev; Krtača za nego; Nozzle; Nadomestni filtri; Torba/vrečka za shranjevanje; Glava strižnika za prirezovanje; Druga
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de cuidados com animais incluídos: Ferramenta de limpeza; Acessório de pente; Escova para remover pelos mortos; Recipiente para pó; Mangueira de extensão; Tubo de extensão; Escova de pentear; Bocal; Filtro de substituição; Saco/estojo de armazenamento; Cabeça de tosquiar e aparar; Outro
it: Componenti del set per la cura degli animali inclusi: Accessorio per pulizia; Accessorio pettine; Spazzola per la rimozione del pelo; Contenitore per la polvere; Tubo flessibile di prolunga; Tubo di prolunga; Spazzola per la toelettatura; Ugello; Filtro di ricambio; Borsa/custodia portaoggetti; Testina di rifinitura; Altro
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos do kit de cuidados para animais: Ferramenta de limpeza; Acessório para pente; Escova removedora de pelos mortos; Recipiente para pó; Mangueira de extensão; Tubo de extensão; Escova para tosa; Bico; Filtros de reposição; Bolsa/Estojo de armazenamento; Cabeçote de máquina de cortar pelos; Outro
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดดูแลสัตว์ที่รวมอยู่ในชุดนี้: อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาด; หัวหวีเสริม; แปรงกำจัดขนร่วง; ถังเก็บฝุ่น; สายต่อ; ท่อต่อ; แปรงดูแลขนสัตว์เลี้ยง; หัวฉีด; แผ่นกรองสำรอง; ถุง/กล่องเก็บ; หัวปัตตาเลี่ยนเล็มขน; อื่นๆ
tr: Hayvan bakım setine dahil bileşenler: Temizlik aleti; Tarak aparatı; Tüy alma fırçası; Toz konteyneri; Uzatma hortumu; Uzatma tüpü; Bakım fırçası; Püskürtme ucu; Yedek filtre; Saklama torbası/kılıfı; Tıraş başlığı; Diğer